New Jersey, session 222, A4177.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Within 180 days following the effective date of this act, the Department of Health shall develop and implement a mobile senior citizen assistance program from available funds.  The program shall consist of the periodic deployment of staffed vehicles to locations at or near nursing homes and senior citizen centers, events, gatherings, and low-income senior housing and other residences and forms of senior housing in this State to provide general assistance to senior citizens which shall include, but shall not be limited to, assistance with: completing applications, correspondence, food services, health care services, Internet access and use, legal services, making appointments, tax services, transportation, and the use of computers and mobile devices. 2.    The Commissioner of Health shall adopt rules and regulations, in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), as are necessary to effectuate the provisions of this act. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.